Idaho, session 2026, S1445.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2304, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2304. RATS -- INVASIVE SPECIES. (1) The Norway rat, roof rat, and
any wild and uncontrolled rat is hereby declared to be an invasive species
pursuant to the invasive species act of 2008, chapter 19, title 22, Idaho
Code. All local governments are hereby empowered to take whatever reason-
able steps, if any, that they deem necessary and appropriate to control and
remove the rat on public property within their jurisdiction and to control
and remove the rat on private property after obtaining written permission
from the legal owner of such property.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "local government" means any
county, city, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state of
Idaho.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.